Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [10A.066] HANDBOOK FOR LOBBYING. new text end new text begin (a) The board must publish on the board's website a handbook for lobbying written in plain language. At a minimum, the handbook must clearly explain: new text end new text begin (1) lobbyist registration requirements, including: new text end new text begin (i) an explanation of when a person is required to register as a lobbyist and what specific types of activities count toward reaching the dollar amount thresholds in section 10A.01, subdivision 21; and new text end new text begin (ii) how registration requirements apply if a person is employed by a government entity; new text end new text begin (2) which activities and expenses do not count toward the dollar amount thresholds in section 10A.01, subdivision 21, but are required to be reported as lobbying disbursements on a principal's report; and new text end new text begin (3) any differences between lobbying the legislature, the executive branch, a political subdivision, and the Public Utilities Commission. new text end new text begin (b) The board must regularly update the handbook to reflect changes to statutes and rules. In developing and updating the handbook, the board must consult individuals who are registered lobbyists but who are not full-time professional lobbyists, including lobbyists for nonprofit organizations, small organizations, and organizations led by individuals who are Black, Indigenous, and people of color. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment, except that the board is not required to publish the handbook until January 15, 2026. new text end